ru: Механизм натяжения каподастра: Эластичный/ремешок; Рычажный эксцентрик; Храповой; Винтовая регулировка; Пружинный; Другое
fi: Capon kiristysmekanismi: Kuminauha/hihna; Vipunokka; Räikkä; Ruuvisäätöinen (sormiruuvi); Jousitettu; Muu
pl: Mechanizm napięcia kapodastra: Opaska elastyczna/pasek; Dźwignia krzywkowa; Zapadka; Regulacja śrubą (śruba radełkowana); Sprężynowy; Inne
zh-CN: 变调夹张力机制: 弹力/系带; 杠杆凸轮; 棘轮; 螺钉调节（指旋螺钉）; 弹簧式; 其他
pt-PT: Mecanismo de tensão do capo: Elástico/correia; Came de alavanca; Roquete; Ajuste por parafuso (parafuso de aperto manual); Ação de mola; Outro
lt-LT: Kapodasterio įtempimo mechanizmas: Elastinis / dirželis; Svirtinis kumštelis; Terkšlė; Reguliuojamas sraigtu (sparnuotasis sraigtas); Spyruoklinis; Kita
de: Spannmechanismus des Kapodasters: Gummiband/Gurt; Hebelnocke; Ratsche; Schraubeinstellung (Rändelschraube); Federbelastet; Sonstige
sl-SI: Mehanizem za napenjanje kapodastra: Elastika/trak; Ročica z ekscentrom; Raglja; Vijačna nastavitev (krilati vijak); Vzmetno; Drugo
en: Capo tension mechanism: Elastic/strap; Lever cam; Ratchet; Screw-adjust (thumb screw); Spring-loaded; Other
nb: Capo-spenningsmekanisme: Strikk/stropp; Spak og kam; Skralle; Skrujustering (tommelskrue); Fjærbelastet; Annet
hr-HR: Mehanizam za zatezanje kapodastra: Elastika / traka; Poluga s ekscentrom; Čegrtaljka; Podešavanje vijkom (krilati vijak); S oprugom; Ostalo
da: Capoens spændingsmekanisme: Elastik/strop; Kam-greb; Skralde; Skruejustering (fingerskrue); Fjederbelastet; Andet
nl: Capo spanningsmechanisme: Elastiek/band; Hendelnok; Ratel; Schroefverstelling (duimschroef); Veerbelast; Overige
it: meccanismo di tensione del capo: Elastico/cinturino; Leva a camma; A cricchetto; Regolazione a vite (vite a testa zigrinata); A molla; Altro
fr: Mécanisme de tension du capodastre: Élastique/sangle; Came à levier; Cliquet; Réglage par vis (vis à oreilles); À ressort; Autre
cs: Mechanismus napínání kapodastru: Elastický pásek/popruh; Páková vačka; Ráčna; Nastavení šroubem (ruční šroub); Odpružené; Jiné
ja: カポテンションメカニズム: ゴム/ストラップ; レバーカム; ラチェット; スクリュー調整 (蝶ネジ); スプリング式; その他
pt-BR: Mecanismo de tensão do capotraste: Elástico/tira; Came de alavanca; Catraca; Ajuste de rosca (parafuso de fixação); Acionado por mola; Outro
ko: 카포 장력 조절 방식: 신축성 밴드/스트랩; 레버 캠; 래칫; 나사 조절식(나비 나사); 스프링 내장형; 기타
sv: Capotastons spänningsmekanism: Resår/rem; Hävstångskam; Spärrmekanism; Skruvjustering (tumskruv); Fjäderbelastad; Annat
th: กลไกปรับความตึงของคาโป้: ยางยืด/สายรัด; ลูกเบี้ยวแบบงัด; แรตเชต; ปรับด้วยสกรู (สกรูมือหมุน); แบบสปริง; อื่นๆ
hu: Kápó feszítőmechanizmusa: Rugalmas pánt/heveder; Karos bütyök; Racsni; Csavaros (szárnyas csavar); Rugós; Egyéb
sk-SK: Napínací mechanizmus kapodastra: Gumička/popruh; Páková vačka; Račňa; Nastavenie skrutkou (krídlová skrutka); Odpružené; Iný
tr: Kapo gerginlik mekanizması: Elastik/kayış; Mandal kamı; Cırcır; Vidayla ayarlanan (kelebek vida); Yaylı; Diğer
vi: Cơ chế căng capo: Thun/dây đai; Cam đòn bẩy; Bánh cóc; Điều chỉnh bằng ốc vít (ốc vít vặn tay); Sử dụng lò xo; Khác
bg-BG: Механизъм за натягане на каподастъра: Ластик/каишка; Ексцентриков лост; Храповик; Винтово регулиране (с накатка); С пружина; Друго
ro-RO: Mecanismul de tensionare a capodastrului: Elastic/curea; Pârghie cu camă; Clichet; Ajustare cu șurub (șurub cu cap striat); Cu arc; Altele
zh-TW: 移調夾張力機制: 彈性/束帶; 槓桿凸輪; 棘輪; 螺絲調整 (指旋螺絲); 彈簧式; 其他
el: Μηχανισμός τάσης καποτάστο: Ελαστικό/ιμάντας; Έκκεντρο μοχλού; Καστάνια; Ρύθμιση με βίδα (πεταλούδα); Με ελατήριο; Άλλο
es: Mecanismo de tensión del capotraste: Elástico/correa; Leva de palanca; Trinquete; Ajuste de tornillo (tornillo de mariposa); Con resorte; Otro